tr: Karabina Kapı Tipi: Otomatik kilitleme; Bükülmüş kapı; Kilitlenmez; Vida kapısı; Çarpma kapısı; Düz kapı; Dönme kilit; Tel kapısı; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de cadeado do mosquetão: Bloqueio automático; Portão torto; Sem bloqueio; Mosquetão; Olhal; Mosquetão reto; Fecho twist lock; Mosquetão swift; Outro
sk-SK: Typ zámku karabíny: Automatické uzamykanie; Karabína s ohnutou západkou; Bez poistky; Skrutková karabína; Zaskakovacia karabína; Rovná karabína; Otočný zámok; Drôtený zámok; Iné
fi: Karabiiniporttityyppi: Automaattinen lukitus; Taivutettu portti; Ei lukittu; Ruuviportti; Napsautettava portti; Suorat portti; Kierrettävä lukko; Langallinen portti; Muu
ro-RO: Tip închizătoare carabină: Închidere automată; Clapetă îndoită; Fără blocare; Clapetă cu șurub; Clapetă cu arc; Clapetă dreaptă; Blocare prin răsucire; Clapetă cu sârmă; Altele
bg-BG: Тип отвор на карабинер: Автоматично заключване; Извита врата; Без заключване; Винтова врата; Плъзгаща врата; Права врата; Заключване чрез завъртане; Телена порта; Други
ru: Тип защелки карабина: Автоблокировка; Изогнутый затвор; Без блокировки; Винтовой затвор; Защелкивающийся затвор; Прямой затвор; Поворотный замок; Кабельный затвор; Другое
ja: カラビナのゲートタイプ: オートロック; ベントゲート; ノンロック; スクリューゲート; スナップゲート; ストレートゲート; ツイストロック; ワイヤーゲート; その他
pl: Typ zasuwy zatrzaśnika: Automatyczne blokowanie; Zapięcie wygięte; Bez blokady; Zapięcie zakręcane; Zapięcie zatrzaskowe; Zapięcie proste; Blokada skrętu; Zapięcie druciane; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta vratc vponke: Samodejno zaklepanje; Ukrivljena ključavnica; Brez zaklepanja; Vijačna ključavnica; Zaskočni nos; Ravna ključavnica; Zaklep z obratom; Žična vrata; Drugo
ko: 카라비너 게이트 유형: 자동 잠금; 벤트 게이트; 비잠금; 스크루 게이트; 스냅 게이트; 스트레이트 게이트; 트위스트락; 와이어 게이트; 기타
cs: Typ zámku karabiny: Automatické zamykání; Prohnutá se západkou; Bez zamykání; Se šroubem; Zaklapávací; Rovná; Otočný zámek; Drátěná; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta vratašaca na karabineru: Automatsko zaključavanje; Zatvaranje savijanjem; Bez zaključavanja; Navojno zatvaranje; Zatvaranje pritiskom; Ravno zatvaranje; Brava s ključem; Žičano zatvaranje; Ostalo
fr: Type de mousqueton: Verrouillage automatique; Portail courbé; Non verrouillable; Porte à vis; Porte à pression; Portail droit; Verrouillage rotatif; Portail grillagé; Autre
th: ประเภทที่เปิดคาราบิเนอร์: ล็อกอัตโนมัติ; ตัวล็อกโค้งเว้า; ไม่ล็อก; ตัวล็อกแบบเกลียว; ตัวล็อกแบบสแน็ป; ตัวล็อกแบบตรง; ตัวล็อกแบบเกลียว; ตัวล็อกแบบลวด; อื่นๆ
vi: Kiểu đóng mở móc carabiner: Tự động khóa; Cổng cong; Không khóa; Cổng vít; Cổng đóng; Cổng thẳng; Khóa vặn; Cổng rào; Khác
it: Tipo di moschettone: Bloccaggio automatico; Cancello piegato; Non bloccabile; Cancello a vite; Cancello a scatto; Cancello dritto; Chiusura a rotazione; Cancello a filo; Altro
lt-LT: Karabino vartelių tipas: Automatinis užraktas; Lenkti varteliai; Be fiksacijos; Užsukamas; Nerakinamas; Tiesūs varteliai; Rakinamas; Vieliniai varteliai; Kita
de: Karabinerschlosstyp: Automatisch schließend; Bent Gate; Gebogener Verschluss; Schraubverschluss; Schnappverschluss; Gerader Verschluss; Drehriegel; Drahtverschluss; Sonstiges
hu: Karabiner zár típusa: Automatikus zár; Hajlított nyelv; Zár nélküli; Csavarozható zár; Bepattintható zár; Egyenes nyelv; Elfordítható zár; Drótnyelv; Egyéb
nb: Type karabinerport: Automatisk låsing; Bøyd lås; Ikke-låsende; Skrulås; Snaplås; Rett lås; Vrilås; Trådport; Annet
zh-TW: 登山扣閘門類型: 自動上鎖; 無所扣環; 搖桿; 登山扣; 彈簧扣環; 簡易扣環; 扭鎖; 線柵; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de fecho do mosquetão: Travamento automático; Gatilho curvo; Sem trava; Gatilho de rosca; Gatilho instantâneo; Gatinho reto; Fechadura rotativa; Gatilho de fio; Outro
en: Carabiner gate type: Auto-locking; Bent gate; Non-locking; Screw gate; Snap gate; Straight gate; Twist lock; Wire gate; Other
sv: Karbinhaketyp: Automatisk låsning; Böjd låsning; Ej låsande; Skruvlåsning; Snäpplåsning; Rak låsning; Vridlås; Trådlösning; Övrigt
es: Tipo de gatillo de mosquetón: Cierre automático; Portón abatible; Sin bloqueo; Portón atornillado; Compuerta a presión; Puerta recta; Cierre giratorio; Compuerta de alambre; Otros
da: Karabinhageporttype: Automatisk låsning; Bøjet port; Ikke-låsende; Skrueport; Snap-port; Lige port; Drejelås; Trådport; Andet
el: Τύπος πύλης καραμπίνερ: Αυτόματο κλείδωμα; Λυγισμένη πύλη; Μη ασφάλισης; Βιδωτή πύλη; Κουμπωτή πύλη; Ίσια πύλη; Βιδωτό κλείδωμα; Συρμάτινη πύλη; Άλλο
zh-CN: 钩环开口类型: 自锁; 弯门; 无锁; 螺旋机舱门; 弹簧门; 直通门; 扭锁; 铁丝网门; 其他
nl: Karabijnhaakpoorttype: Automatische vergrendeling; Gebogen poort; Niet-vergrendelend; Schroefpoort; Klikpoort; Rechte poort; Draaislot; Draadpoort; Andere